New Jersey, session 222, A2641.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.    N.J.S.2B:14-5 is amended to read as follows: 2B:14-5.  Filling vacancy in Surrogate's office.  If a Surrogate does not take office within 30 days after the end of the preceding term or a vacancy occurs in the office of Surrogate, the Governor, with advice and consent of the Senate, shall fill the vacancy from the political party of the person last elected to the office.  The person appointed shall serve until election and qualification of a successor. Election of a successor for a five-year term shall occur at the next general election unless the vacancy occurs within [37] 70 days before the election, in which case it shall occur at the second succeeding general election. (cf: N.J.S.2B:14-5) 2.    N.J.S.40A:9-70 is amended to read as follows: 40A:9-70. When a vacancy shall occur in the office of the county clerk of any county other than by expiration of term, the Governor shall fill such vacancy with the advice and consent of the Senate by appointment of a member of the same political party as that of the previous incumbent of the office, and the commission of said appointee shall expire when a successor is elected and qualified.  The successor in such case shall be elected for a term of 5 years at the general election next succeeding the happening of the vacancy unless such vacancy shall occur within [37] 70 days next preceding such election, in which case it shall be filled at the second succeeding general election. (cf: N.J.S.40A:9-70) 3.    N.J.S.40A:9-88 is amended to read as follows: 40A:9-88. When a vacancy shall occur in the office of the register of deeds and mortgages of any county other than by expiration of term, the Governor shall fill such vacancy with the advice and consent of the Senate, by appointment of a member of the same political party as that of the previous incumbent of the office, and the commission of said appointee shall expire when a successor is elected and qualified.  The successor in such case shall be elected for a term of 5 years at the general election next succeeding the happening of the vacancy  unless such vacancy shall occur within [37] 70 days next preceding such election, in  which case it shall be filled at the second succeeding general election. (cf: N.J.S.40A:9-88) 4.    N.J.S.40A:9-102 is amended to read as follows: 40A:9-102. When a vacancy shall occur in the office of sheriff of any county, other than by expiration of term, the Governor shall fill such vacancy with the advice and consent of the Senate by appointment of a member of the same political party as that of the previous incumbent of the office, and the commission of said appointee shall expire when a successor is elected and qualified.  The successor in such case shall be elected for a term of 3 years at the general election next succeeding the happening of the vacancy unless such vacancy shall occur within [37] 70 days next preceding such election, in which case it shall be filled at the second succeeding general election. (cf: N.J.S.40A:9-102) 5.    This act shall take effect immediately.